old/prolog2/prolog/table/ispell/zalizp.aff
allaffixes on

wordchars [\xc0-\xdf] [\xe0-\xff]

suffixes

flag *\323:
    .		>	re

flag *\061:
    .		>	re

flag *\315:
    .		>	re

flag *\064:
    .		>	re

flag *\071:
    .		>	re

flag *\062:
    .		>	re

flag *\060:
    .		>	re

flag *\065:
    .		>	re
